District of Columbia statutes.
35-214

Reduced fares for school children.

Expired.

Feb. 25, 1931, 46 Stat. 1419, ch. 302
1981 Ed., § 44-214.
The Act of February 25, 1931, 46 Stat. 1419, ch. 302, formerly codified as this section, became inoperative upon acceptance of the agreement between the Capital Traction Company and the Washington Railway and Electric Company for unification under the Act of January 14, 1933, 47 Stat. 759, ch. 10.